North Carolina, session 2025, HB1069.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-1203 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(10) Civil penalties. – In addition to any other lawful remedy, the ordinance
adopted under this section may provide for the imposition of civil penalties
against any person or entity that fails to comply with an order entered in
accordance with this section."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to the City of New Bern.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to order enforcing
G.S. 160D-1203 entered on or after that date.
*H1069-v-1*